Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3202
Sections; applicability.

Sections 30-3201 and 30-3207 shall apply to fiduciary relationships now in existence or hereafter established.

Laws 1953, c. 67, § 3, p. 218;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-601.02.